North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-09.6 Developmentally Disabled Facility Loan Program [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 81, § 1]

6-09.6-01.
Revolving loan fund — Appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 81, § 1.

6-09.6-01.1.
Developmentally disabled facility loan fund program no. 2. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 81, § 1.

6-09.6-01.2.
Developmentally disabled facility loan fund program no. 3. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 81, § 1.

6-09.6-02.
Administration of revolving fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 81, § 1.

6-09.6-02.1.
Audit and costs of administration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 81, § 1.

6-09.6-03.
Amount of loan — Terms and conditions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 81, § 1.

6-09.6-04.
Standards — Administration procedure. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 81, § 1.

6-09.6-05.
Powers of Bank of North Dakota. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 81, § 1.